dictsource/gu_rules
.group પ
        પ          pV
        _L22) પ (L21L21_         p@       // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21L21_      p@       // generated
        L22) પ (L21L21_          p@       // generated
        _L22) પ (L21L23_         p        // generated
        _L22) પ (L21L23          p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21L23_      p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21L23       p        // generated
        L22) પ (L21L23_          p        // generated
        L22) પ (L21L23           p        // generated
        _L22) પ (L21્_           p@       // generated
        _L22) પ (L21્            p@       // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21્_        p@       // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21્         p@       // generated
        L22) પ (L21્_            p@       // generated
        L22) પ (L21્             p@       // generated
        _L20L22) પ (L21_         p@       // generated
        _L20L22) પ (L21L22_      p@       // generated
        L20L22) પ (L21_          p@       // generated
        L20L22) પ (L21L22_       p@       // generated
        _L21L23) પ (L21L20_      p        // generated
        _L21L23) પ (L21L20       p        // generated
        L21L23) પ (L21L20_       p        // generated
        L21L23) પ (L21L20        p        // generated
        _L22) પ (L21ર_           p        // generated
        _L22) પ (L21ર            p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21ર_        p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21ર         p        // generated
        _L20) પ (પL22_           p        // generated
        _L20) પ (પL22            p        // generated
        _L22L20) પ (પL22_        p        // generated
        _L22L20) પ (પL22         p        // generated
        L20) પ (પL22_            p        // generated
        L20) પ (પL22             p        // generated
        _L22) પ (હL22_           p        // generated
        _L22) પ (હL22            p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (હL22_        p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (હL22         p        // generated
        L22) પ (હL22_            p        // generated
        L22) પ (હL22             p        // generated
        _ેL22) પ (L21_           p@       // generated
        _ેL22) પ (L21L22_        p@       // generated
        _ેL22) પ (L21            p@       // generated
        ેL22) પ (L21_            p@       // generated
        ેL22) પ (L21L22_         p@       // generated
        ેL22) પ (L21             p@       // generated
        રL22L22) પ (L21L20_      p@       // generated
        રL22L22) પ (L21L20       p@       // generated
        _L22) પ (L21ન_           p        // generated
        _L22L22) પ (L21ન_        p        // generated
        પઁ         pV~        // + candrabindu
        પ (_       p
        પ (B       p
        પ (્ય      p:

        પ્પ         p:V      // pp -> p:
        પ્પ (_      p:
        પ્પ (B      p:

.group ફ
        ફ          p#V
        _L22) ફ (L21L21_         p#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21L21_      p#@      // generated
        L22) ફ (L21L21_          p#@      // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21L23_         p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21L23          p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21L23_      p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21L23       p#       // generated
        L22) ફ (L21L23_          p#       // generated
        L22) ફ (L21L23           p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21્_           p#@      // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21્            p#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21્_        p#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21્         p#@      // generated
        L22) ફ (L21્_            p#@      // generated
        L22) ફ (L21્             p#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ફ (L21_         p#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ફ (L21L22_      p#@      // generated
        L20L22) ફ (L21_          p#@      // generated
        L20L22) ફ (L21L22_       p#@      // generated
        _L21L23) ફ (L21L20_      p#       // generated
        _L21L23) ફ (L21L20       p#       // generated
        L21L23) ફ (L21L20_       p#       // generated
        L21L23) ફ (L21L20        p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21ર_           p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21ર            p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21ર_        p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21ર         p#       // generated
        _L20) ફ (પL22_           p#       // generated
        _L20) ફ (પL22            p#       // generated
        _L22L20) ફ (પL22_        p#       // generated
        _L22L20) ફ (પL22         p#       // generated
        L20) ફ (પL22_            p#       // generated
        L20) ફ (પL22             p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (હL22_           p#       // generated
        _L22) ફ (હL22            p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (હL22_        p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (હL22         p#       // generated
        L22) ફ (હL22_            p#       // generated
        L22) ફ (હL22             p#       // generated
        _ેL22) ફ (L21_           p#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ફ (L21L22_        p#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ફ (L21            p#@      // generated
        ેL22) ફ (L21_            p#@      // generated
        ેL22) ફ (L21L22_         p#@      // generated
        ેL22) ફ (L21             p#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ફ (L21L20_      p#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ફ (L21L20       p#@      // generated
        _L22) ફ (L21ન_           p#       // generated
        _L22L22) ફ (L21ન_        p#       // generated
        ફઁ         p#V~        // + candrabindu
        ફ (_       p#
        ફ (B       p#
        ફ઼         fV
        ફ઼ઁ        fV~        // + candrabindu
        ફ઼ (_      f
        ફ઼ (B      f

.group બ
        બ          bV
        _L22) બ (L21L21_         b@       // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21L21_      b@       // generated
        L22) બ (L21L21_          b@       // generated
        _L22) બ (L21L23_         b        // generated
        _L22) બ (L21L23          b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21L23_      b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21L23       b        // generated
        L22) બ (L21L23_          b        // generated
        L22) બ (L21L23           b        // generated
        _L22) બ (L21્_           b@       // generated
        _L22) બ (L21્            b@       // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21્_        b@       // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21્         b@       // generated
        L22) બ (L21્_            b@       // generated
        L22) બ (L21્             b@       // generated
        _L20L22) બ (L21_         b@       // generated
        _L20L22) બ (L21L22_      b@       // generated
        L20L22) બ (L21_          b@       // generated
        L20L22) બ (L21L22_       b@       // generated
        _L21L23) બ (L21L20_      b        // generated
        _L21L23) બ (L21L20       b        // generated
        L21L23) બ (L21L20_       b        // generated
        L21L23) બ (L21L20        b        // generated
        _L22) બ (L21ર_           b        // generated
        _L22) બ (L21ર            b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21ર_        b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21ર         b        // generated
        _L20) બ (પL22_           b        // generated
        _L20) બ (પL22            b        // generated
        _L22L20) બ (પL22_        b        // generated
        _L22L20) બ (પL22         b        // generated
        L20) બ (પL22_            b        // generated
        L20) બ (પL22             b        // generated
        _L22) બ (હL22_           b        // generated
        _L22) બ (હL22            b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (હL22_        b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (હL22         b        // generated
        L22) બ (હL22_            b        // generated
        L22) બ (હL22             b        // generated
        _ેL22) બ (L21_           b@       // generated
        _ેL22) બ (L21L22_        b@       // generated
        _ેL22) બ (L21            b@       // generated
        ેL22) બ (L21_            b@       // generated
        ેL22) બ (L21L22_         b@       // generated
        ેL22) બ (L21             b@       // generated
        રL22L22) બ (L21L20_      b@       // generated
        રL22L22) બ (L21L20       b@       // generated
        _L22) બ (L21ન_           b        // generated
        _L22L22) બ (L21ન_        b        // generated
        બઁ         bV~        // + candrabindu
        બ (_       b
        બ (B       b

.group ભ
        ભ          b#V
        _L22) ભ (L21L21_         b#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21L21_      b#@      // generated
        L22) ભ (L21L21_          b#@      // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21L23_         b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21L23          b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21L23_      b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21L23       b#       // generated
        L22) ભ (L21L23_          b#       // generated
        L22) ભ (L21L23           b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21્_           b#@      // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21્            b#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21્_        b#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21્         b#@      // generated
        L22) ભ (L21્_            b#@      // generated
        L22) ભ (L21્             b#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ભ (L21_         b#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ભ (L21L22_      b#@      // generated
        L20L22) ભ (L21_          b#@      // generated
        L20L22) ભ (L21L22_       b#@      // generated
        _L21L23) ભ (L21L20_      b#       // generated
        _L21L23) ભ (L21L20       b#       // generated
        L21L23) ભ (L21L20_       b#       // generated
        L21L23) ભ (L21L20        b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21ર_           b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21ર            b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21ર_        b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21ર         b#       // generated
        _L20) ભ (પL22_           b#       // generated
        _L20) ભ (પL22            b#       // generated
        _L22L20) ભ (પL22_        b#       // generated
        _L22L20) ભ (પL22         b#       // generated
        L20) ભ (પL22_            b#       // generated
        L20) ભ (પL22             b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (હL22_           b#       // generated
        _L22) ભ (હL22            b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (હL22_        b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (હL22         b#       // generated
        L22) ભ (હL22_            b#       // generated
        L22) ભ (હL22             b#       // generated
        _ેL22) ભ (L21_           b#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ભ (L21L22_        b#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ભ (L21            b#@      // generated
        ેL22) ભ (L21_            b#@      // generated
        ેL22) ભ (L21L22_         b#@      // generated
        ેL22) ભ (L21             b#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ભ (L21L20_      b#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ભ (L21L20       b#@      // generated
        _L22) ભ (L21ન_           b#       // generated
        _L22L22) ભ (L21ન_        b#       // generated
        ભઁ         b#V~        // + candrabindu
        ભ (_       b#
        ભ (B       b#
